Utah statutes.
17B-2a-815.   Rates and charges for service.

(1)  The board of trustees of a public transit district shall fix rates and charges for service provided by the district by a two-thirds vote of all board members.

(2)  Rates and charges shall:

(a)  be reasonable; and

(b)  to the extent practicable:

(i)  result in enough revenue to make the public transit system self supporting; and

(ii)  be sufficient to:

(A)  pay for district operating expenses;

(B)  provide for repairs, maintenance, and depreciation of works and property that the district owns or operates;

(C)  provide for the purchase, lease, or acquisition of property and equipment;

(D)  pay the interest and principal of bonds that the district issues; and

(E)  pay for contracts, agreements, leases, and other legal liabilities that the district incurs.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

